Utah statutes.
4-24-25.   Unlawful acts specified -- Allegation concerning evidence of ownership relative to hides.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to:

(a)  permit any cattle, calves, horses, mules, or sheep, except unweaned calves or colts, that are not branded or marked in accordance with this chapter, to forage upon an open range in this state or outside an enclosure;

(b)  brand or mark any livestock with a brand or mark which is not a matter of record on the central brand and mark registry;

(c)  obliterate, change, or remove a recorded brand or mark; or

(d)  destroy, mutilate, or conceal any hide with intent to, or for the purpose of, removing evidence of ownership of the hide, or ownership of the animal from which the hide was removed.

(2)  In any prosecution for violation of this section, the state need not allege the ownership of the hide, or the animal or carcass from which the hide was removed; the complaint or information being sufficient if it alleges that ownership is unknown and that the hide is not the property of the defendant.

